District of Columbia statutes.
47-387.52

Effect of reprogrammings on Maintenance of Effort and Matching funds.

Beginning in Fiscal Year 2002, the Chief Financial Officer shall certify that any proposed reprogramming by the Mayor will not affect the amounts necessary to meet and maintain the local requirements for Maintenance of Effort and Matching funds and the certification shall be included in the proposed reprogramming request submitted by the Mayor to the Council.

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 4803, 48 DCR 6981
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 79(b), 51 DCR 881
Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia, functions during control year, see § 1-204.24a.
D.C. Law 15-105 validated a previously made technical correction.
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 4303 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).